Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1,119
Certain professions and businesses; sections applicable; initial credential; renewal of credential; denial or refusal to renew; department; powers.

(1) Sections 38-1,119 to 38-1,123 apply to the following professions and businesses: Asbestos abatement, inspection, project design, and training; lead-based paint abatement, inspection, project design, and training; medical radiography; and radon detection, measurement, and mitigation.

(2) If an applicant for an initial credential to practice a profession or operate a business does not meet all of the requirements for the credential, the department shall deny issuance of the credential. If an applicant for an initial credential or a credential holder applying for renewal of the credential has committed any of the acts set out in section 38-178 or 38-182, as applicable, the department may deny issuance or refuse renewal of the credential or may issue or renew the credential subject to any of the terms imposed under section 38-196 in order to protect the public.

Laws 2007, LB463, § 119;

Laws 2021, LB148, § 52.